Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 15 COLORADO EDUCATIONAL AND CULTURAL FACILITIES AUTHORITY
23-15-110. Bonds.

The authority may issue from time to time its bonds in such principal amounts as the authority shall determine for the purpose of financing all or a part of the cost of any facilities authorized by this article or for the refinancing of outstanding obligations. In anticipation of the sale of such bonds, the authority may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority or other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The notes shall be issued in the same manner as bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a bond resolution of the authority may contain.

The bonds may be issued as serial bonds, as term bonds, or as a combination of both types. All bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the leasing, mortgaging, or sale by the authority of the facilities concerned or of any part thereof as designated in the resolutions of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as designated in a trust indenture authorized by the authority, which trust indenture shall name a bank or trust company in Colorado, or outside of Colorado if it is determined by the authority to be in the best interests of the financing, such determination to be conclusive, as trustee, or out of other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged. Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at such times, may be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registerable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Colorado, may bear interest at such rate or rates per annum as shall be determined by the authority or as may be determined from time to time by a designated agent of the authority in accordance with specified standards and procedures and without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law, may be evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which manual signature may be either that of an officer of the authority or that of an officer of the trustee authenticating the same, may be in such form of coupon bonds having attached thereto interest coupons bearing the facsimile signature of an authorized officer of the authority, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this article as shall be provided in the resolutions of the authority under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as is provided in a trust indenture authorized by the authority. Notwithstanding anything in this subsection (2) to the contrary, in the case of short-term notes or other obligations maturing not later than one year from the date of issuance thereof, the board may authorize the executive director, associate executive director, or any officer of the board to fix principal amounts, maturity dates, interest rates, and purchase prices of any particular issue of such short-term notes or obligations, subject to such limitations as to maximum term, maximum principal amount outstanding, and maximum net effective interest rates as the board shall prescribe by resolution, and such authorization shall remain effective for the period of time designated in the initial resolution regardless of whether the composition of the board changes in the interim unless sooner rescinded by the board.

If deemed advisable by the authority, there may be retained in the resolutions or the trust indenture under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof as may be specified in such resolutions or in such trust indenture, at such price or prices, after such notice or notices, and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such resolutions or in such trust indenture and as may be briefly recited on the face of the bonds; but nothing in this article shall be construed to confer on the authority the right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the resolutions or in such trust indenture under which they are issued.

The bonds or notes of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as may be determined by the authority, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums, and commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof. The power to fix the date of sale of bonds and notes, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds and notes, and to take all other necessary action to sell and deliver bonds and notes may be delegated to the executive director of the authority by resolution of the authority. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates to be exchanged for such definitive bonds.

Issuance by the authority of one or more series of bonds for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same facilities or any other facilities or for any other purpose under this article, but the resolutions or trust indenture under which any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize the terms and provisions of any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds and the terms upon which such additional bonds may be issued and secured. Any outstanding bonds of the authority may, at any time and from time to time, be refunded or advance refunded by the authority by the issuance of its bonds for such purpose and in such principal amount as may be determined by the authority, which may include interest accrued or to accrue thereon with or without giving effect to investment income thereon and other expenses necessary to be paid in connection therewith. If deemed advisable by the authority, such bonds may be refunded or advance refunded for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a facility or any portion thereof.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded have then matured or will mature thereafter either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof for the payment of the bonds to be refunded thereby or by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the bonds to be so refunded, regardless of whether or not the bonds to be refunded were issued in connection with the same facilities or separate facilities or for any other purpose under this article and regardless of whether or not the bonds proposed to be refunded are payable on the same date or different dates or are due serially or otherwise. The proceeds of any such bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof and, pending such application, may be placed in escrow to be applied to such purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be determined by the authority. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested or deposited in securities or depositories meeting the requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing at such time or times as are appropriate to assure the prompt payment as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profit, if any, earned or realized on any such investment may also be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded or to the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds or for any other purpose under this article. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of such proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner. The portion of the proceeds of any such bonds issued for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a facility may be invested or deposited in securities or depositories meeting the requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., maturing not later than the time or times when such proceeds will be needed for the purpose of paying all or any part of such cost. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on such investment may be applied to the payment of all or any part of such cost or may be used by the authority in any lawful manner. All such bonds shall be subject to the provisions of this article in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1103, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 636, § 2, effective April 5.

L. 89:

(5)(b) amended, p. 1109, § 14, effective July 1.

23-15-110.5. Colorado education savings program.

There is hereby established the Colorado education savings program which shall be administered by the authority and which shall include, but need not be limited to, components concerning bonds and certificates, education, financial incentives, and alternative payment plans. In furtherance of the Colorado education savings program and in addition to any powers, duties, and responsibilities enumerated in this article, the authority may:

Designate the bonds or certificates of participation of the authority as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates;

Designate the bonds or certificates of participation of issuers other than the authority as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates if the issuer of such instruments applies for such designation and if such instruments satisfy the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section.

Bonds or certificates of participation may be designated as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if such instruments satisfy the following criteria:

The bonds or certificates are structured and are to be marketed statewide by the underwriters in such a manner as to attract a broad range of investors in the retail Colorado bond market, including, but not limited to, parents, grandparents, or others who are interested in planning for the college education of their children;

The interest on the bonds or certificates is exempt from Colorado income taxation;

The bonds or certificates are issued by a state or local governmental entity, agency, institution, subdivision, district, or financing authority on its own behalf or on behalf of a nonprofit organization which is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or on behalf of a nonprofit corporation which is organized principally for the support and benefit of such state or local governmental entity, agency, institution, subdivision, district, financing authority, or nonprofit corporation;

The bonds or certificates, at the time such instruments are designated as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates, are rated in one of the two highest rating categories of such instruments by one or more nationally recognized organizations which regularly rate such obligations;

The bonds or certificates are either zero-coupon, deep discount, or comparable instruments and the maturation dates of such instruments are structured to the extent possible both to accommodate the financing needs of the issuer or the entity on whose behalf the instruments are being issued and to fulfill the needs of individuals planning on using the proceeds of such instruments for education purposes.

The authority shall collaborate with the Colorado commission on higher education on the development of educational materials designed to inform parents and others concerning the importance of accumulating the financial resources necessary to pay for a child's college education and the options available to accomplish that accumulation of resources, including the option of investing in Colorado education savings bonds or certificates.

The authority shall evaluate the feasibility of:

Payment of financial incentives to holders of Colorado education savings bonds or certificates if, at maturity, the proceeds of such bonds or certificates are applied to expenses incurred for education in the state of Colorado;

Staggered or periodic forms of payment for Colorado education savings bonds or certificates, including, but not limited to, payroll deduction plans;

Matching employer-employee purchase plans for Colorado education savings bonds or certificates.

No bond, certificate, or other financial instrument sold, traded, conveyed, or otherwise transferred in the state shall bear the designation, logo, trade name, or trademark of a Colorado education savings bond or certificate, nor shall any such bond or financial instrument be called, described, marketed, or otherwise be made to appear to a reasonable person to be a Colorado education savings bond or certificate unless such bond or financial instrument has been so designated pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 849, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 983, § 4, effective April 12.

L. 98:

(2)(e) and (4)(a) amended, p. 606, § 8, effective May 4.

23-15-111. Negotiability of bonds.

All bonds and the interest coupons applicable thereto are hereby declared and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-112. Security for bonds and notes.

The principal of and interest on any bonds or notes issued by the authority may be secured by a pledge of or security interest in the revenues, rentals, and receipts out of which the same may be made payable or from other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged or used as security and may be secured by a trust indenture, mortgage, or deed of trust (including assignment of leases or other contract rights of the authority thereunder) covering all or any part of the facilities from which the revenues, rentals, or receipts so pledged or used as security may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such facility thereafter made. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such trust indenture, mortgage, or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds or notes to be authorized as to:

The pledging or providing of a security interest in all or any part of the revenues of a facility or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any individual, partnership, corporation, or association or any other body, public or private, to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

The maintenance of properties covered thereby;

The fixing and collection of mortgage payments, rents, fees, and other charges and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby and the use and disposition of the revenues;

The setting aside, creating, and maintaining of special and reserve funds and sinking funds and the use and disposition of the revenues;

The limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of the facilities;

The limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds or notes then or thereafter to be issued may be applied and the pledging or providing of a security interest in such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or any issue of the bonds or notes;

The limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated and the total amount of bonds or notes consented to by the holders thereof and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The limitations on the amount of moneys derived from a facility to be expended for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the authority;

The defining of the acts or omissions to act constituting a default in the duties of the authority to holders of its obligations and the providing of rights and remedies to such holders in the event of a default;

The mortgaging of a facility and the site thereof for the purpose of securing the bondholders or noteholders;

Such other additional covenants, agreements, and provisions as are judged advisable or necessary by the authority for the security of the holders of such bonds or notes.

Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding at the time the pledge is made and thereafter until satisfied. The revenues, moneys, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort or contract or in any other form against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded. Each pledge, agreement, lease, indenture, mortgage, and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue to be effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made has been fully paid or provision for such payment has been duly made. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the authority made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the resolutions authorizing the bonds or in any trust indenture, mortgage, or deed of trust executed as security therefor, said payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, action in the nature of mandamus, appointment of a receiver in equity, foreclosure of any mortgage or deed of trust, or any one or more of said remedies.

In addition to the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, bonds of the authority may be secured by a pooling of leases, loans, or mortgages whereby the authority may assign its rights as lessor, lender, or mortgagee and pledge rents, loan payments, or mortgage payments under two or more leases, loans, or mortgages, with two or more participating educational institutions or cultural institutions as lessees, borrowers, or mortgagors, respectively, upon such terms as may be provided for in the resolutions of the authority or as may be provided for in a trust indenture or mortgage or deed of trust authorized by the authority.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 990, § 6, effective April 8.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 606, § 9, effective May 4.

23-15-113. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1107, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-114. Purchase.

The authority may purchase its bonds or notes out of any funds available therefor. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds or notes, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders or noteholders.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1107, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-115. Procedure before expenditure of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the authority may not undertake any facility authorized by this article unless, prior to the expenditure of proceeds, the board finds that:

Such facility will enable or assist an educational institution or a cultural institution to fulfill its obligation to provide facilities; and

In the case of an educational institution, such facility has been reviewed and approved by the commission if such approval is required pursuant to section 23-1-106.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1107, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 637, § 3, effective April 5.

L. 89:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 991, § 7, effective April 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 606, § 10, effective May 4.

23-15-116. Trust agreement to secure bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued pursuant to this article may be secured by a trust agreement between the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company in Colorado. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received or the proceeds of any contract or contracts pledged and may convey or mortgage the facilities or any portion thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable, proper, and not in violation of law, including particularly such provisions as have been specifically authorized to be included in any resolution or resolutions of the authority authorizing bonds thereof. Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys may furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee or trustees and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a facility.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1107, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-117. Payment of bonds - nonliability of state.

Bonds and notes issued by the authority shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, a debt, or a liability of the state, the general assembly, or any county, city, city and county, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state or of any other political subdivision or body corporate and politic within the state, and neither the state, the general assembly, nor any county, city, city and county, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state shall be liable thereon; nor shall such bonds or notes constitute the giving, pledging, or loaning of the faith and credit of the state, the general assembly, or any county, city, city and county, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state or of any other political subdivision or body corporate and politic within the state, but such bonds or notes shall be payable solely from the funds provided for in this article. Unless by specific pledge in an act of issuance as authorized by law, the issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this article shall not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the state or any subdivision thereof nor empower the authority to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments therefor or to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments therefor or make any appropriation for their payment, and such appropriation or levy is prohibited. Nothing in this section shall prevent or be construed to prevent the authority from pledging its full faith and credit or the full faith and credit of a participating educational institution or cultural institution to the payment of bonds or notes authorized pursuant to this article. Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the authority to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Colorado or to authorize the authority to levy or collect taxes or assessments; and all bonds issued by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this article are payable and shall state that they are payable solely from the funds pledged for their payment in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance or with any trust indenture, mortgage, or deed of trust executed as security therefor and are not a debt or liability of the state of Colorado. Unless by specific pledge in an act of issuance as authorized by law, the state shall not in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation, or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by the authority. No breach of any such pledge, mortgage, obligation, or agreement shall otherwise impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1108, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 991, § 8, effective April 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 607, § 11, effective May 4.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1066, § 12, effective May 22.

23-15-118. Exemption from taxation and securities law.

The authority is hereby declared to be a public instrumentality of the state, performing a public function for the benefit of the people of the state for the improvement of their welfare and educational and cultural opportunities. Accordingly, the income or other revenues of the authority, all properties at any time owned by the authority, any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and the transfer thereof and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof), and all mortgages, leases, trust indentures, and other documents issued in connection therewith shall be exempt at all times from all taxation and assessments in the state of Colorado. Bonds issued by the authority shall also be exempt from the "Colorado Securities Act", article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1108, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 992, § 9, effective April 8.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 740, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 607, § 12, effective May 4.

23-15-119. Rents and charges.

A sufficient amount of the revenues derived with respect to a facility, except such part of such revenues as may be necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide reserves and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements, and improvements provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds or notes of the authority or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund which is hereby pledged to and charged with the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds or notes as the same become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding at the time the pledge is made and thereafter until satisfied, and the rates, rents, fees, charges, and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort or contract or in any other form against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the bond resolution, any trust agreement, any other agreement, nor any lease by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or to such trust agreement. Except as may be otherwise provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking or other similar fund may be a fund for all such bonds or notes issued to finance facilities at a particular educational institution or cultural institution without distinction or priority of one over another; except that the authority in any such resolution or trust agreement may provide that such sinking or other similar fund shall be the fund for a particular facility at an educational institution or a cultural institution and for the bonds issued to finance a particular facility and, additionally, may permit and provide for the issuance of bonds having a lien with respect to the security authorized which is subordinate to other bonds of the authority, and, in such case, the authority may create separate sinking or other similar funds with respect to such subordinate lien bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1109, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 992, § 10, effective April 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 608, § 13, effective May 4.

23-15-120. Fees.

All expenses of the authority incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article shall be payable solely from funds provided pursuant to this article, and no liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the moneys which are provided pursuant to this article; except that, for the purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation until such date as the authority derives moneys from funds provided pursuant to this article, the authority may borrow such moneys as may be required for the necessary expenses of organization and operation. Such borrowed moneys shall be repaid within a reasonable time after the authority receives funds provided pursuant to this article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to imply mandatory participation by an educational institution or a cultural institution. An initial planning service fee in an amount determined by the authority shall be paid to the authority by each participating educational institution or cultural institution that applies for financial assistance to provide for its facilities. Such initial planning service fees shall be included in the cost of the facilities to be financed and shall not be refundable by the authority, whether or not any such application is approved or, if approved, whether or not such financial assistance is accomplished. In addition to such initial fee, an annual planning service fee shall be paid to the authority by each participating educational institution or cultural institution in an amount determined by the authority. Such fees shall be paid on said dates or in such installments as may be satisfactory to the authority. Such fees may be used for:

Necessary expenses to determine the need for facilities;

Necessary administrative expenses; and

Reserves for anticipated future expenses.

In addition, the authority may retain, for a negotiated fee, the services of any other public or private person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation for the furnishing of services and data for use by the authority in determining the need and location of any such facilities for which application is being made or for such other services or surveys as the authority deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

The authority may charge a reasonable fee to cover expenses incurred by the authority in connection with the review of an application by an issuer other than the authority for designation of bonds or certificates as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates pursuant to section 23-15-110.5. Such fee may also be used to cover a portion of the cost to the authority of administering the program.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1109, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

IP(2) amended, p. 993, § 11, effective April 8; (4) added, p. 984, § 5, effective April 12.

L. 98:

IP(2) amended, p. 608, § 14, effective May 4.

23-15-121. Conveyance of title - release of lien.

When the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the authority to finance the cost of facilities or to refinance the outstanding indebtedness of one or more participating educational institutions or cultural institutions, including any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance such bonds, have been fully paid and retired or when adequate provision has been made to fully pay and retire the same and when all other conditions of the resolution, the lease, the trust indenture, and the mortgage, deed of trust, or other form of security arrangement, if any, authorizing and securing the same have been satisfied, the authority shall promptly do all things and execute such deeds, conveyances, and other documents as are necessary and required to release the lien of such mortgage, deed of trust, or other form of security arrangement in accordance with the provisions thereof and to convey its right, title, and interest in such facilities so financed, and any other facilities leased or mortgaged or subject to a deed of trust or any other form of security arrangement to secure the bonds, to such participating educational institution or cultural institution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1110, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 993, § 12, effective April 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 609, § 15, effective May 4.

23-15-122. Investment of funds.

The authority may invest the proceeds from the sale of a series of bonds or any funds related to the series in such securities and other investments, whether or not any such investment or reinvestment is authorized under any other law of this state, as may be provided in the proceedings under which the series of bonds are authorized to be issued, including but not limited to the following: Bonds or other obligations of the United States; bonds or other obligations, the payment of the principal and interest of which is unconditionally guaranteed by the United States; obligations issued or guaranteed as to principal and interest by any agency or person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to authority granted by the congress of the United States; obligations issued or guaranteed by any state of the United States or any political subdivision of any such state; prime commercial paper; prime finance company paper; bankers' acceptances drawn on and accepted by commercial banks; repurchase agreements fully secured by obligations issued or guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or by any person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to authority granted by the congress of the United States; or certificates of deposit or time deposits issued by commercial banks or savings and loan associations that are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor. The authority may invest any other funds in the securities as provided in this section and with such maturities as the authority shall determine if such maturities are on a date or dates prior to the time that, in the judgment of the authority, the funds so invested will be required for expenditure. The express judgment of the authority as to the time that any funds will be required for expenditure or be redeemable is final and conclusive.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1110, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 805, § 5, effective May 25.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 153, § 66, effective July 1.

23-15-123. Proceeds as trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations or as revenues or receipts, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. Any officer, bank, or trust company with which such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this article, subject to such regulations as this article and the resolution authorizing the bonds, notes, or other obligations of any issue or the trust agreement securing such obligations shall provide.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1111, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-124. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights of obligees.

The state hereby pledges to and agrees with the holders of any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to the provisions of this article that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested pursuant to this article in the authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, maintain, and operate any facility or to establish, revise, charge, and collect rates, rents, fees, and other charges whenever it may be convenient or necessary to produce sufficient revenues to meet the expenses of maintenance and operation thereof and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, notes, or other obligations authorized and issued pursuant to this article and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this article. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of such parties until such bonds, notes, or other obligations, together with interest thereon, interest on any unpaid installment of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority. Nothing in this article precludes such limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision is made by law for the protection of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority or those entering into such contracts with the authority. The authority may include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds, notes, or other obligations and in such contracts.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1111, § 1, effective July 1.